Georgia, session 2025_26, HB154.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Chapter 11 of Title 31 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to emergency
medical services, is amended by adding a new Code section to read as follows:
"31-11-13.
(a) Ambulance services, whether provided by a public, private nonprofit, or private for
profit entity, are hereby declared to be essential services in this state.
(b) This Code section shall not be construed to:
(1) Revise or impact the provision of such services through local coordinating entities
within territorial zones and health districts in this state; nor
(2) Grant new or additional authority, oversight, or regulatory power to any state agency
or local government of this state.
H. B. 154 (SUB)
- 1 -

LC 46 1133S
(c) This Code section shall not conflict with or supplant Code Section 31-11-3, 31-11-4,
or 38-3-71 or Georgia's status as a member of the EMS Interstate Compact."
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 154 (SUB)
- 2 -